Illinois, session 104th, HB4043.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Probation Community Service Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 115/1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 204a-1)7    Sec. 1. (a) "Public or community service" means 8uncompensated labor for a not-for-profit organization or 9public body whose purpose is to enhance physical, or mental 10stability of the offender, environmental quality or the social 11welfare and which agrees to accept public or community service 12from offenders and to report on the progress of the offender 13and the public or community service to the court or to the 14authorized diversion program that has referred the offender 15for public or community service. "Public or Community Service" 16does not include blood donation or assignment to labor at a 17blood bank. For the purposes of this Act, "blood bank" has the 18meaning ascribed to the term in Section 2-124 of the Illinois 19Clinical Laboratory and Blood Bank Act.20    (b) "Site" means a not-for-profit organization, public 21body, church, charitable organization, or individual agreeing 22to accept community service from offenders and to report on 23the progress of ordered or required public or community   HB4043- 2 -LRB104 07802 RLC 17848 b1service to the court or to the authorized diversion program 2that has referred the offender for public or community 3service.4    (c) The county boards of the several counties in this 5State are authorized to establish and operate agencies to 6develop and supervise programs of public or community service 7for those persons placed by the court on probation, 8conditional discharge, or supervision.9    (d) The programs shall be developed in cooperation with 10the circuit courts for the respective counties developing such 11programs and shall conform with any law restricting the use of 12public or community service.13    (d-1) The court may give credit toward the fulfillment of 14community service hours for participation in activities and 15treatment as determined by court services. 16    (e) Neither the State, any local government, probation 17department, public or community service program or site, nor 18any official, volunteer, or employee thereof acting in the 19course of their official duties shall be liable for any injury 20or loss a person might receive while performing public or 21community service as ordered either (1) by the court or (2) by 22any duly authorized station or probation adjustment, teen 23court, community mediation, or other administrative diversion 24program authorized by the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for a 25violation of a penal statute of this State or a local 26government ordinance (whether penal, civil, or quasi-criminal)   HB4043- 3 -LRB104 07802 RLC 17848 b1or for a traffic offense, nor shall they be liable for any 2tortious acts of any person performing public or community 3service, except for wilful, wanton misconduct or gross 4negligence on the part of such governmental unit, probation 5department, or public or community service program or site or 6on the part of the official, volunteer, or employee.7    (f) No person assigned to a public or community service 8program shall be considered an employee for any purpose, nor 9shall the county board be obligated to provide any 10compensation to such person.11(Source: P.A. 98-824, eff. 1-1-15.)